Massachusetts, session 194th, H4876.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 6 the following section:-
Section 6A. (a) No person shall be the next of kin, for the purposes of this chapter, for a
deceased relative if the relative had an abuse prevention order, pursuant to chapter 209A, or a
harassment prevention order, pursuant to chapter 258E, against the person at the time of the
relative’s death.
(b) Upon the death of a person with an abuse prevention order, pursuant to chapter 209A,
or a harassment prevention order, pursuant to chapter 258E, against them at the time of their
death, the department of criminal justice information shall notify the holder of the abuse
prevention order or the harassment prevention order of the person’s death.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 34, the word “or”.
of 3

SECTION 3. Clause (a) of the definition of “Coercive control” in said section 1 of said
chapter 209A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following subclause:-
(x) facilitating contact or abuse by a person against whom an abuse prevention order has
been issued; or
SECTION 4. Said chapter 209A is hereby further amended by inserting after section 8
the following section:-
Section 8A. Upon the request of the holder of an abuse prevention order under this
chapter, an agency of the commonwealth shall make best efforts to remove the person’s name,
address, contact information or other identifiable information from the agency’s public website.
SECTION 5. Said chapter 209A is hereby further amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 12. The department of the trial court shall establish a training and education
program for survivors of domestic abuse and persons who hold or are attempting to obtain an
abuse prevention order under this chapter or a harassment prevention order under chapter 258E.
The training and education program shall include information about: (i) the rights and recourses
under the law available to survivors and holders of abuse or harassment prevention orders; (ii)
public and private support services and resources for survivors and persons holding abuse or
harassment prevention orders; and (iii) any other topics the department deems necessary.
SECTION 6. Chapter 258E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10 the following section:-
of 3

Section 10A. Upon the request of the holder of a harassment prevention order under this
chapter, an agency of the commonwealth shall make best efforts to remove the person’s name,
address, contact information or other identifiable information from the agency’s public website
SECTION 7. This act shall be known as the Overcomer’s Law.
of 3